Florida, session 2026, SB826.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) and paragraph 16 (a) of subsection (2) of section 501.95, Florida Statutes, are 17 amended to read: 18 501.95âGift certificates and credit memos.â 19 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 20 (b)ââGift certificateâ means a certificate, gift card, 21 stored value card, reward card, consumer loyalty card, 22 promotional gift card, or similar instrument purchased for 23 monetary consideration when the certificate, card, or similar 24 instrument is redeemable for merchandise, food, or services 25 regardless of whether any cash may be paid to the owner of the 26 certificate, card, or instrument as part of the redemption 27 transaction, but this term does shall not include tickets as 28 specified in s. 717.1355 or manufacturer or retailer discounts 29 and coupons. 30 (2)(a)âA gift certificate purchased or credit memo issued 31 in this state may not have an expiration date, expiration 32 period, or any type of postsale charge or fee imposed on the 33 gift certificate or credit memo, including, but not limited to, 34 service charges, dormancy fees, account maintenance fees, or 35 cash-out fees. However, a gift certificate may have an 36 expiration date of not less than 3 years if it is provided as a 37 charitable contribution, or not less than 1 year if it is 38 provided as a benefit pursuant to an employee-incentive program, 39 and the expiration date is prominently disclosed in writing to 40 the consumer at the time it is provided. In addition, a gift 41 certificate may have an expiration date if it is provided to the 42 recipient, or to a purchaser for transfer to the recipient, as 43 part of a loyalty or promotional program when the recipient does 44 not pay a separate identifiable charge for the certificate, or 45 if it is provided in conjunction with a convention, conference, 46 vacation, or sporting or fine arts event having a limited 47 duration so long as the majority of the value paid by the 48 recipient is attributable to the convention, conference, 49 vacation, or event. An issuer may honor a gift certificate that 50 has expired on or before the effective date of this act. 51 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 52 made by this act to section 501.95, Florida Statutes, in a 53 reference thereto, paragraph (i) of subsection (1) of section 54 538.03, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 55 538.03âDefinitions; applicability.â 56 (1)âAs used in this part, the term: 57 (i)ââSecondhand goodsâ means personal property previously 58 owned or used which is not regulated metals property regulated 59 under part II and which is purchased, consigned, or traded as 60 used property. The term includes gift certificates and credit 61 memos as defined in s. 501.95 which are purchased, consigned, or 62 traded by a secondhand dealer. The term does not include office 63 furniture; pianos; books; clothing; organs; coins; motor 64 vehicles; costume jewelry; gold, silver, platinum, palladium, or 65 rhodium bullion that has been assayed and is properly marked as 66 to its weight and fineness; cardio and strength training or 67 conditioning equipment designed primarily for indoor use; and 68 secondhand sports equipment that is not permanently labeled with 69 a serial number. As used in this paragraph, the term âsecondhand 70 sports equipmentâ does not include golf clubs. 71 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 72 made by this act to section 501.95, Florida Statutes, in a 73 reference thereto, section 717.1045, Florida Statutes, is 74 reenacted to read: 75 717.1045âGift certificates and similar credit items. 76 Notwithstanding s. 717.117, an unredeemed gift certificate or 77 credit memo as defined in s. 501.95 is not required to be 78 reported as unclaimed property. 79 (1)âThe consideration paid for an unredeemed gift 80 certificate or credit memo is the property of the issuer of the 81 unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo. 82 (2)âAn unredeemed gift certificate or credit memo is 83 subject only to any rights of a purchaser or owner thereof and 84 is not subject to a claim made by any state acting on behalf of 85 a purchaser or owner. 86 (3)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that this section 87 apply to the custodial holding of unredeemed gift certificates 88 and credit memos. 89 (4)âHowever, a gift certificate or credit memo described in 90 s. 501.95(2)(b) shall be reported as unclaimed property. The 91 consideration paid for such a gift certificate or credit memo is 92 the property of the owner of the gift certificate or credit 93 memo. 94 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.